Utah statutes.
10-9a-606.   Common or community area parcels on a plat -- No separate
ownership -- Ownership interest equally divided among other parcels on plat
and included in description of other parcels.
(1) (a)  A parcel designated as a common or community area on a plat recorded
in compliance with this part may not be separately owned or conveyed
independent of the other lots, units, or parcels created by the plat unless:
(i)  the parcel is being acquired by a municipality for a governmental
purpose; and
(ii)  the conveyance is approved by the owners of at least 75% of the lots,
units, or parcels on the plat, after the municipality gives its approval.
(b)  A notice of the owner approval described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii) shall
be:
(i)  attached as an exhibit to the document of conveyance; or
(ii)  recorded concurrently with the conveyance as a separate document.
(2)  The ownership interest in a parcel described in Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  for purposes of assessment, be divided equally among all parcels created
by the plat, unless a different division of interest for assessment purposes
is indicated on the plat or an accompanying recorded document; and
(b)  be considered to be included in the description of each instrument
describing a parcel on the plat by its identifying plat number, even if the
common or community area interest is not explicitly stated in the instrument.
